Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 225

Proxies

48-225-101. Proxies.

The articles or operating agreement may provide for proxies with terms and conditions consistent with the proxy provisions applicable to shareholders under § 48-17-203. The person to whom proxies may be given and the purposes of such proxies is limited in the same manner as voting agreements under § 48-226-101(b).

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 36.